Georgia statutes. TITLE 27 Game And Fish
Article 8 Fertility Control on Wildlife

27-3-180.
Findings and declarations.

The General Assembly recognizes that the hunting and taking of wildlife pursuant to this title are a valued cultural heritage consistent with the sound scientific principles of wildlife management and play an essential and effective role in the management of wildlife populations. The General Assembly further recognizes that the State of Georgia and its citizens derive substantial economic, recreational, and esthetic benefits from such activities. Therefore, the General Assembly finds and declares that it is in the public interest to ensure public health, safety, welfare, and conservation of the state’s wildlife resources by strictly regulating in this state the use of fertility control on any wildlife.

History.

Code 1981, §

27-3-180

, enacted by Ga. L. 2010, p. 952, § 9/SB 474.

27-3-181.
Use of fertility control of wildlife.

As used in this article, the term “fertility control” means any action that results in contraception, contragestation, or sterilization or produces a temporary or permanent state of infertility.

It shall be unlawful to apply any fertility control to any wildlife, except in accordance with a wildlife fertility control permit issued under the provisions of this article and any rules or regulations adopted by the board.

Nothing in this article shall prohibit or apply to the medically necessary treatment of sick or injured wildlife by properly licensed veterinarians. This article shall not limit employees of the department in the performance of their official duties.

History.

Code 1981, §

27-3-181

, enacted by Ga. L. 2010, p. 952, § 9/SB 474.

27-3-182.
Permit application for applying fertility control to wildlife.

Application for a wildlife fertility control permit shall be made on forms obtained from the department.

The department may issue such a permit only if it has determined that the proposed activity is in the best interest of the wildlife resources. In making such a determination, the department may consider the following:

Whether the proposed activity may preclude the use of hunting as the primary management tool;

Whether the drug has been approved by the federal Food and Drug Administration;

Whether there is a need for the information and data or a need to manage the target wildlife population to achieve the objectives sought by the applicant;

Whether the proposed activity would duplicate sound scientific research previously accomplished;

Whether the proposed activity is of reasonably sound design;

Whether the proposed activity poses health or safety risks to humans and wildlife, including, but not limited to, wildlife species that may consume the target wildlife;

Whether the proposed activity includes all necessary approvals, including, but not limited to, any federal or state agency approvals for specific or extra label use and any agency or institutional endorsement of the application; and

Whether the applicant or the sponsor has documented that he or she has adequate funds available to implement the proposed activity.

In the event that a determination has been made to revoke, suspend, deny, or refuse to renew any wildlife fertility control permit issued pursuant to this article, the applicant for such permit may appeal the determination according to the provisions stated in Code Section 27-2-25.

History.

Code 1981, §

27-3-182

, enacted by Ga. L. 2010, p. 952, § 9/SB 474.

27-3-183.
Rules and regulations.

The board is authorized to promulgate and adopt any rules and regulations, consistent with sound wildlife management practices and not inconsistent with law, as it deems necessary and appropriate to carry out the purposes of this article.

History.

Code 1981, §

27-3-183

, enacted by Ga. L. 2010, p. 952, § 9/SB 474.

27-3-184.
Wildlife fertility control permits; cease and desist orders; possession of wildlife.

The department shall have the authority to prescribe the form, contents, and conditions for a wildlife fertility control permit and application as it deems necessary to carry out the purposes of this article.

The department shall have the authority to issue, revoke, or deny any permit required by this article and pursuant to any rules and regulations adopted pursuant to this article.

The department may, prior to a hearing and in accordance with Code Section 27-1-37, issue a cease and desist order or other appropriate order to any person who is violating any provision of this article or any regulation, permit, or license issued pursuant to this article.

The department shall have the authority in accordance with Code Sections 27-1-21 and 27-1-37 to take possession of and dispose of any wildlife if it has reason to believe that fertility control has been administered to such wildlife in violation of this article.

History.

Code 1981, §

27-3-184

, enacted by Ga. L. 2010, p. 952, § 9/SB 474.

27-3-185.
Penalties.

Any person who violates any provision of this article shall be guilty of a misdemeanor of a high and aggravated nature and upon conviction shall be punished by a fine of not less than $1,500.00 nor more than $5,000.00, imprisonment for a period not exceeding 12 months, or both such fine and imprisonment.

Any licenses or permits issued under this title to any person convicted of violating any provision of this article shall by operation of law be revoked and shall not be reissued for a period of three years. The department shall notify the person in writing of the revocation.

History.

Code 1981, §

27-3-185

, enacted by Ga. L. 2010, p. 952, § 9/SB 474.